Utah statutes.
59-2-1217.   Denial of relief -- Appeal.
Any person aggrieved by the denial in whole or in part of relief claimed under
this part, except when the denial is based upon late filing of claim for
relief, may appeal the denial to the commission by filing a petition within 30
days after the denial.
